North Carolina, session 2025, SB965.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-1320 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1320. Definitions; scope; exemptions.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(b) Exemptions. – Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, this Article does not
apply to the following entities: the General Assembly, the Judicial Department, the Community
Colleges System Office, The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions, the
Office of the State Auditor, the State Board of Elections, the State Highway Patrol, and the
Department of State Treasurer. These entities may elect to participate in the information
technology programs, services, or contracts offered by the Department, including information
technology procurement, in accordance with the statutes, policies, and rules of the Department.
The election shall be made in writing, as follows:
(1) For the General Assembly, by the Legislative Services Commission.
(2) For the Judicial Department, by the Chief Justice.
(2a) For the Community Colleges System Office, by the State Board of
Community Colleges.
(3) For The University of North Carolina, by the Board of Governors.
(4) For the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, by the
respective boards of trustees.
(5) For the Office of the State Auditor, by the State Auditor.
(6) For the State Board of Elections, by the Executive Director of the State Board
of Elections.
(7) For the State Highway Patrol, by the Commander of the State Highway Patrol.
(8) For the Department of State Treasurer, other than the Investment Authority
under Part 1 of Article 6 of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes, by the State
Treasurer.
(9) For the Investment Authority under Part 1 of Article 6 of Chapter 147 of the
General Statutes, by the Board of Directors of the Authority.
(c) Deviations. – Any State agency may apply in writing to the State Chief Information
Officer for approval to deviate from this Article. If granted by the State Chief Information
*S965-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Officer, any deviation shall be consistent with available appropriations and shall be subject to
any terms and conditions specified by the State CIO.
(c1) Consultation. – Any exempt agency may request, and the Department shall provide,
advisory and consultation resources on any form of information technology activities and
services provided by the Department to participating agencies under this Article.
(d) Review. – Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, any State agency shall
review and evaluate any deviation authorized and shall, in consultation with the Department of
Information Technology, adopt a plan to phase out any deviations that the State CIO determines
to be unnecessary in carrying out functions and responsibilities unique to the agency having a
deviation. The plan adopted by the agency shall include a strategy to coordinate its general
information processing functions with the Department of Information Technology in the manner
prescribed by this Article and shall provide for its compliance with policies, procedures, and
guidelines adopted by the Department of Information Technology. Any agency receiving a
deviation shall submit its plan to the Office of State Budget and Management as directed by the
State Chief Information Officer."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Information Technology the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to establish an interagency liaison network to effectuate the
Department's consultation obligation under Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 965-First Edition